src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PFV-sii-tsidiitla_run-away_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - tsídiitł'á[run-away] :
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg1:       [tsídastł'o, tsídìsistł'o]
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg2:       tsídìsíítł'o
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg3:       tsídìstł'o
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl1:       [tsídìsiìtł'o, tsídìsaàtł'o]
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [dàtsídìsiìtł'o, dàtsídìsaàtł'o]
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl2:       tsídìsastł'o
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl2+Distr: dàtsídìsastł'o
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl3:       tsígídìstł'o
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl3+Distr: dàtsígídìstł'o
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg4:       tsíts'ídìstł'o
    tsídiitł'á+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg4+Distr: dàtsíts'ídìstł'o
